California, session 20252026, AB1757.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25524.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25524.1. (a) Except for the existing Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 owned by Pacific Gas and Electric Company and San Onofre Units 2 and 3 owned by Southern California Edison Company and San Diego Gas and Electric Company, a nuclear fission thermal powerplant requiring the reprocessing of fuel rods, including any to which this chapter does not otherwise apply, except those having a vested right as defined in this section, shall not be a permitted land use in the state or, where applicable, certified by the commission until both of the following conditions are met:(1) The commission finds that the United States through its authorized agency has identified and approved, and there exists a technology for the construction and operation of, nuclear fuel rod reprocessing plants.(2) (A) The commission has reported its findings and the reasons therefor pursuant to paragraph (1) to the Legislature. That report shall be assigned to the appropriate policy committees for review. The commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings unless within those 100 legislative days either house of the Legislature adopts by a majority vote of its members a resolution disaffirming the findings of the commission made pursuant to paragraph (1).(B) A resolution of disaffirmance shall set forth the reasons for the action and shall provide, to the extent possible, guidance to the commission as to an appropriate method of bringing the commission’s findings into conformance with paragraph (1).(C) If a disaffirming resolution is adopted, the commission shall reexamine its original findings consistent with matters raised in the resolution. On conclusion of its reexamination, the commission shall transmit its findings in writing, with the reasons therefor, to the Legislature.(D) If the findings are that the conditions of paragraph (1) have been met, the commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings to the Legislature unless within those 100 legislative days both houses of the Legislature act by statute to declare the findings null and void and takes appropriate action.(E) To allow sufficient time for the Legislature to act, the reports of findings of the commission shall be submitted to the Legislature at least six calendar months before the adjournment of the Legislature sine die.(b) The commission shall further find on a case-by-case basis that facilities with adequate capacity to reprocess nuclear fuel rods from a certified nuclear facility or to store that fuel if that storage is approved by an authorized agency of the United States are in actual operation or will be in operation at the time that the nuclear facility requires reprocessing or storage if the storage of fuel is in an offsite location to the extent necessary to provide continuous onsite full core reserve storage capacity.(c) The commission shall continue to receive and process notices of intention and applications for certification pursuant to this division, but shall not issue a decision pursuant to Section 25523 granting a certificate until the requirements of this section have been met. All other permits, licenses, approvals, or authorizations for the entry or use of the land, including orders of court, that may be required may be processed and granted by the governmental entity concerned, but construction work to install permanent equipment or structures shall not commence until the requirements of this section have been met.(d) (1) This section does not apply to a nuclear microreactor.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “nuclear microreactor” means a nuclear fission reactor that meets all of the following criteria:(A) The nuclear fission reactor has a rated electrical output of not more than 20 megawatts per unit.(B) The nuclear fission reactor is designed for modular construction and deployment.(C) All components of the nuclear fission reactor are fully assembled in a factory and shipped to a location, and the nuclear fission reactor is highly portable and requires little or no construction onsite.(D) The nuclear fission reactor is licensed, or eligible for licensing, by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or is authorized by the United States Department of Energy or the United States Department of Defense.SEC. 2. Section 25524.2 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25524.2. (a) Except for the existing Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 owned by Pacific Gas and Electric Company and San Onofre Units 2 and 3 owned by Southern California Edison Company and San Diego Gas and Electric Company, no a nuclear fission thermal powerplant, including any to which this chapter does not otherwise apply, but excepting except those exempted herein, by this section, shall not be a permitted land use in the state, or state or, where applicable, be certified by the commission until both of the following conditions have been met:(a)(1) The commission finds that there has been developed and that the United States through its authorized agency has approved and there exists a demonstrated technology or means for the disposal of high-level nuclear waste.(b)(1)(2) (A) The commission has reported its findings and the reasons therefor pursuant to paragraph (a) to the Legislature. That report shall be assigned to the appropriate policy committees for review. The commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings unless within those 100 legislative days either house of the Legislature adopts by a majority vote of its members a resolution disaffirming the findings of the commission made pursuant to subdivision (a). paragraph (1).(2)(B) A resolution of disaffirmance shall set forth the reasons for the action and shall provide, to the extent possible, guidance to the commission as to an appropriate method of bringing the commission’s findings into conformance with subdivision (a). paragraph (1).(3)(C) If a disaffirming resolution is adopted, the commission shall reexamine its original findings consistent with matters raised in the resolution. On conclusion of its reexamination, the commission shall transmit its findings in writing, with the reasons therefor, to the Legislature.(4)(D) If the findings are that the conditions of subdivision (a) paragraph (1) have been met, the commission may proceed to certify nuclear fission thermal powerplants 100 legislative days after reporting its findings to the Legislature unless within those 100 legislative days both houses of the Legislature act by statute to declare the findings null and void and take appropriate action.(5)(E) To allow sufficient time for the Legislature to act, the reports of findings of the commission shall be submitted to the Legislature at least six calendar months prior to before the adjournment of the Legislature sine die.(c)As used in subdivision (a),(b) For purposes of this section, “technology or means for the disposal of high-level nuclear waste” means a method for the permanent and terminal disposition of high-level nuclear waste. Nothing in this section requires This section does not require that facilities for the application of that technology or means be available at the time that the commission makes its findings. That disposition of high-level nuclear waste does not preclude the possibility of an approved process for retrieval of the waste.(d)(c) The commission shall continue to receive and process notices of intention and applications for certification pursuant to this division division, but shall not issue a decision pursuant to Section 25523 granting a certificate until the requirements of this section have been met. All other permits, licenses, approvals, or authorizations for the entry or use of the land, including orders of court, which that may be required may be processed and granted by the governmental entity concerned, but construction work to install permanent equipment or structures shall not commence until the requirements of this section have been met.(d) (1) This section does not apply to a nuclear microreactor.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “nuclear microreactor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 25524.1.